Utah statutes.
32A-2-101 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission's power to establish state stores -- Limitations -- Signage.

(1) (a)  The commission may establish state stores in numbers and at places, owned or leased by the department, the commission considers proper for the sale of liquor, by employees of the state, in accordance with this title and the rules made under this title.

(b) An employee of a state store is considered an employee of the department and shall meet all qualification requirements for employment in Section 32A-1-111.

(2) (a)  The total number of state stores may not at any time aggregate more than that number determined by dividing the population of the state by 48,000.

(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (2), population shall be determined by:

(i)  the most recent United States decennial or special census; or

(ii) another population determination made by the United States or state governments.

(3) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b) or (c), a state store may not be established:

(i)  within 600 feet of a community location, as measured by the method in Subsection (3)(d); or

(ii)  within 200 feet of a community location, measured in a straight line from the nearest entrance of the proposed state store to the nearest property boundary of the community location.

(b)  With respect to the establishment of a state store, the commission may authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement of Subsection (3)(a)(i) if:

(i)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a state store in the community are limited;

(ii)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where practical in the neighborhood concerned;

(iii)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission determines that establishing the state store would not be detrimental to the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and

(iv) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent to the variance; or

(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing authority, the commission finds that:

(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the state store is to be located;

(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(b)(iv)(B)(I) other than through the establishment of a state store; and

(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the state store is to be located for establishing a state store to satisfy the unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(b)(iv)(B)(I).

(c)  With respect to the establishment of a state store, the commission may authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement of Subsection (3)(a)(ii) if:

(i)  the community location at issue is:

(A)  a public library; or

(B)  a public park;

(ii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a state store in the community are limited;

(iii)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where practical in the neighborhood concerned;

(iv)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission determines that establishing the state store would not be detrimental to the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and

(v) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent to the variance; or

(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing authority, the commission finds that:

(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the state store is to be located;

(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(c)(v)(B)(I) other than through the establishment of a state store; and

(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the state store is to be located for establishing a state store to satisfy the unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(c)(v)(B)(I).

(d)  The 600 foot limitation described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) is measured from the nearest entrance of the state store by following the shortest route of ordinary pedestrian travel to the property boundary of the community location.

(4) (a)  Nothing in this section prevents the commission from considering the proximity of any educational, religious, and recreational facility, or any other relevant factor in reaching a decision on a proposed location.

(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (4), "educational facility" includes:

(i)  a nursery school;

(ii)  an infant day care center; and

(iii)  a trade and technical school.

(5) (a)  The commission shall ensure that signage installed or replaced at or near a state store, on or after May 11, 2010, complies with Subsection (5)(b) if the signage is:

(i)  attached to the exterior of the premises of a state store; or

(ii)  not attached to the premises of a state store, but otherwise alerts or directs a person to the location of a state store.

(b)  Signage described in Subsection (5)(a) shall contain the following words in the size of lettering required by Subsection (5)(c):

(i)  "state"; or

(ii)  "State of Utah".

(c)  The text described in Subsection (5)(b) shall be in lettering that is equal to or larger than the size of any text on the same signage that refers to "liquor" or "wine."

